By those [winds] scattering [dust] dispersing
And those [clouds] carrying a load [of water]
And those [ships] sailing with ease
And those [angels] apportioning [each] matter,
Indeed, what you are promised is true.
And indeed, the recompense is to occur.
By the heaven containing pathways,
Indeed, you are in differing speech.
Deluded away from the Qur’an is he who is deluded.
Destroyed are the falsifiers
Who are within a flood [of confusion] and heedless.
They ask, "When is the Day of Recompense?"
[It is] the Day they will be tormented over the Fire
[And will be told], "Taste your torment. This is that for which you were impatient."
Indeed, the righteous will be among gardens and springs,
Accepting what their Lord has given them. Indeed, they were before that doers of good.
They used to sleep but little of the night,
And in the hours before dawn they would ask forgiveness,
And from their properties was [given] the right of the [needy] petitioner and the deprived.
And on the earth are signs for the certain [in faith]
And in yourselves. Then will you not see?
And in the heaven is your provision and whatever you are promised.
Then by the Lord of the heaven and earth, indeed, it is truth - just as [sure as] it is that you are speaking.
Has there reached you the story of the honored guests of Abraham? -
When they entered upon him and said, "[We greet you with] peace." He answered, "[And upon you] peace, [you are] a people unknown.
Then he went to his family and came with a fat [roasted] calf
And placed it near them; he said, "Will you not eat?"
And he felt from them apprehension. They said, "Fear not," and gave him good tidings of a learned boy.
And his wife approached with a cry [of alarm] and struck her face and said, "[I am] a barren old woman!"
They said, "Thus has said your Lord; indeed, He is the Wise, the Knowing."
[Abraham] said, "Then what is your business [here], O messengers?"
They said, "Indeed, we have been sent to a people of criminals
To send down upon them stones of clay,
Marked in the presence of your Lord for the transgressors."
So We brought out whoever was in the cities of the believers.
And We found not within them other than a [single] house of Muslims.
And We left therein a sign for those who fear the painful punishment.
And in Moses [was a sign], when We sent him to Pharaoh with clear authority.
But he turned away with his supporters and said," A magician or a madman."
So We took him and his soldiers and cast them into the sea, and he was blameworthy.
And in ‘Aad [was a sign], when We sent against them the barren wind.
It left nothing of what it came upon but that it made it like disintegrated ruins.
And in Thamud, when it was said to them, "Enjoy yourselves for a time."
But they were insolent toward the command of their Lord, so the thunderbolt seized them while they were looking on.
And they were unable to arise, nor could they defend themselves.
And [We destroyed] the people of Noah before; indeed, they were a people defiantly disobedient.
And the heaven We constructed with strength, and indeed, We are [its] expander.
And the earth We have spread out, and excellent is the preparer.
And of all things We created two mates; perhaps you will remember.
So flee to Allah. Indeed, I am to you from Him a clear warner.
And do not make [as equal] with Allah another deity. Indeed, I am to you from Him a clear warner.
Similarly, there came not to those before them any messenger except that they said, "A magician or a madman."
Did they suggest it to them? Rather, they [themselves] are a transgressing people.
So leave them, [O Muhammad], for you are not to be blamed.
And remind, for indeed, the reminder benefits the believers.
And I did not create the jinn and mankind except to worship Me.
I do not want from them any provision, nor do I want them to feed Me.
Indeed, it is Allah who is the [continual] Provider, the firm possessor of strength.
And indeed, for those who have wronged is a portion [of punishment] like the portion of their predecessors, so let them not impatiently urge Me.
And woe to those who have disbelieved from their Day which they are promised.
By the mount
And [by] a Book inscribed
In parchment spread open
And [by] the frequented House
And [by] the heaven raised high
And [by] the sea filled [with fire],
Indeed, the punishment of your Lord will occur.
Of it there is no preventer.
On the Day the heaven will sway with circular motion
And the mountains will pass on, departing -
Then woe, that Day, to the deniers,
Who are in [empty] discourse amusing themselves.
The Day they are thrust toward the fire of Hell with a [violent] thrust, [its angels will say],
"This is the Fire which you used to deny.
Then is this magic, or do you not see?
[Enter to] burn therein; then be patient or impatient - it is all the same for you. You are only being recompensed [for] what you used to do."
Indeed, the righteous will be in gardens and pleasure,
Enjoying what their Lord has given them, and their Lord protected them from the punishment of Hellfire.
[They will be told], "Eat and drink in satisfaction for what you used to do."
They will be reclining on thrones lined up, and We will marry them to fair women with large, [beautiful] eyes.
And those who believed and whose descendants followed them in faith - We will join with them their descendants, and We will not deprive them of anything of their deeds. Every person, for what he earned, is retained.
And We will provide them with fruit and meat from whatever they desire.
They will exchange with one another a cup [of wine] wherein [results] no ill speech or commission of sin.
There will circulate among them [servant] boys [especially] for them, as if they were pearls well-protected.
And they will approach one another, inquiring of each other.
They will say, "Indeed, we were previously among our people fearful [of displeasing Allah].
So Allah conferred favor upon us and protected us from the punishment of the Scorching Fire.
Indeed, we used to supplicate Him before. Indeed, it is He who is the Beneficent, the Merciful."
So remind [O Muhammad], for you are not, by the favor of your Lord, a soothsayer or a madman.
Or do they say [of you], "A poet for whom we await a misfortune of time?"
Say, "Wait, for indeed I am, with you, among the waiters."
Or do their minds command them to [say] this, or are they a transgressing people?
Or do they say, "He has made it up"? Rather, they do not believe.
Then let them produce a statement like it, if they should be truthful.
Or were they created by nothing, or were they the creators [of themselves]?
Or did they create the heavens and the earth? Rather, they are not certain.
Or have they the depositories [containing the provision] of your Lord? Or are they the controllers [of them]?
Or have they a stairway [into the heaven] upon which they listen? Then let their listener produce a clear authority.
Or has He daughters while you have sons?
Or do you, [O Muhammad], ask of them a payment, so they are by debt burdened down?
Or have they [knowledge of] the unseen, so they write [it] down?
Or do they intend a plan? But those who disbelieve - they are the object of a plan.
Or have they a deity other than Allah? Exalted is Allah above whatever they associate with Him.
And if they were to see a fragment from the sky falling, they would say, "[It is merely] clouds heaped up."
So leave them until they meet their Day in which they will be struck insensible -
The Day their plan will not avail them at all, nor will they be helped.
And indeed, for those who have wronged is a punishment before that, but most of them do not know.
And be patient, [O Muhammad], for the decision of your Lord, for indeed, you are in Our eyes. And exalt [Allah] with praise of your Lord when you arise.
And in a part of the night exalt Him and after [the setting of] the stars.
By the star when it descends,
Your companion [Muhammad] has not strayed, nor has he erred,
Nor does he speak from [his own] inclination.
It is not but a revelation revealed,
Taught to him by one intense in strength -
One of soundness. And he rose to [his] true form
While he was in the higher [part of the] horizon.
Then he approached and descended
And was at a distance of two bow lengths or nearer.
And he revealed to His Servant what he revealed.
The heart did not lie [about] what it saw.
So will you dispute with him over what he saw?
And he certainly saw him in another descent
At the Lote Tree of the Utmost Boundary -
Near it is the Garden of Refuge -
When there covered the Lote Tree that which covered [it].
The sight [of the Prophet] did not swerve, nor did it transgress [its limit].
He certainly saw of the greatest signs of his Lord.
So have you considered al-Lat and al-‘Uzza?
And Manat, the third - the other one?
Is the male for you and for Him the female?
That, then, is an unjust division.
They are not but [mere] names you have named them - you and your forefathers - for which Allah has sent down no authority. They follow not except assumption and what [their] souls desire, and there has already come to them from their Lord guidance.
Or is there for man whatever he wishes?
Rather, to Allah belongs the Hereafter and the first [life].
And how many angels there are in the heavens whose intercession will not avail at all except [only] after Allah has permitted [it] to whom He wills and approves.
Indeed, those who do not believe in the Hereafter name the angels female names,
And they have thereof no knowledge. They follow not except assumption, and indeed, assumption avails not against the truth at all.
So turn away from whoever turns his back on Our message and desires not except the worldly life.
That is their sum of knowledge. Indeed, your Lord is most knowing of who strays from His way, and He is most knowing of who is guided.
And to Allah belongs whatever is in the heavens and whatever is in the earth - that He may recompense those who do evil with [the penalty of] what they have done and recompense those who do good with the best [reward] -
Those who avoid the major sins and immoralities, only [committing] slight ones. Indeed, your Lord is vast in forgiveness. He was most knowing of you when He produced you from the earth and when you were fetuses in the wombs of your mothers. So do not claim yourselves to be pure; He is most knowing of who fears Him.
Have you seen the one who turned away
And gave a little and [then] refrained?
Does he have knowledge of the unseen, so he sees?
Or has he not been informed of what was in the scriptures of Moses
And [of] Abraham, who fulfilled [his obligations] -
That no bearer of burdens will bear the burden of another
And that there is not for man except that [good] for which he strives
And that his effort is going to be seen -
Then he will be recompensed for it with the fullest recompense
And that to your Lord is the finality
And that it is He who makes [one] laugh and weep
And that it is He who causes death and gives life
And that He creates the two mates - the male and female -
From a sperm-drop when it is emitted
And that [incumbent] upon Him is the next creation
And that it is He who enriches and suffices
And that it is He who is the Lord of Sirius
And that He destroyed the first [people of] ‘Aad
And Thamud - and He did not spare [them] -
And the people of Noah before. Indeed, it was they who were [even] more unjust and oppressing.
And the overturned towns He hurled down
And covered them by that which He covered.
Then which of the favors of your Lord do you doubt?
This [Prophet] is a warner like the former warners.
The Approaching Day has approached.
Of it, [from those] besides Allah, there is no remover.
Then at this statement do you wonder?
And you laugh and do not weep
While you are proudly sporting?
So prostrate to Allah and worship [Him].
The Hour has come near, and the moon has split [in two].
And if they see a miracle, they turn away and say, "Passing magic."
And they denied and followed their inclinations. But for every matter is a [time of] settlement.
And there has already come to them of information that in which there is deterrence -
Extensive wisdom - but warning does not avail [them].
So leave them, [O Muhammad]. The Day the Caller calls to something forbidding,
Their eyes humbled, they will emerge from the graves as if they were locusts spreading,
Racing ahead toward the Caller. The disbelievers will say, "This is a difficult Day."
The people of Noah denied before them, and they denied Our servant and said, "A madman," and he was repelled.
So he invoked his Lord, "Indeed, I am overpowered, so help."
Then We opened the gates of the heaven with rain pouring down
And caused the earth to burst with springs, and the waters met for a matter already predestined.
And We carried him on a [construction of] planks and nails,
Sailing under Our observation as reward for he who had been denied.
And We left it as a sign, so is there any who will remember?
And how [severe] were My punishment and warning.
And We have certainly made the Qur’an easy for remembrance, so is there any who will remember?
‘Aad denied; and how [severe] were My punishment and warning.
Indeed, We sent upon them a screaming wind on a day of continuous misfortune,
Extracting the people as if they were trunks of palm trees uprooted.
And how [severe] were My punishment and warning.
And We have certainly made the Qur’an easy for remembrance, so is there any who will remember?
Thamud denied the warning
And said, "Is it one human being among us that we should follow? Indeed, we would then be in error and madness.
Has the message been sent down upon him from among us? Rather, he is an insolent liar."
They will know tomorrow who is the insolent liar.
Indeed, We are sending the she-camel as trial for them, so watch them and be patient.
And inform them that the water is shared between them, each [day of] drink attended [by turn].
But they called their companion, and he dared and hamstrung [her].
And how [severe] were My punishment and warning.
Indeed, We sent upon them one blast from the sky, and they became like the dry twig fragments of an [animal] pen.
And We have certainly made the Qur’an easy for remembrance, so is there any who will remember?
The people of Lot denied the warning.
Indeed, We sent upon them a storm of stones, except the family of Lot - We saved them before dawn
As favor from us. Thus do We reward he who is grateful.
And he had already warned them of Our assault, but they disputed the warning.
And they had demanded from him his guests, but We obliterated their eyes, [saying], "Taste My punishment and warning."
And there came upon them by morning an abiding punishment.
So taste My punishment and warning.
And We have certainly made the Qur’an easy for remembrance, so is there any who will remember?
And there certainly came to the people of Pharaoh warning.
They denied Our signs, all of them, so We seized them with a seizure of one Exalted in Might and Perfect in Ability.
Are your disbelievers better than those [former ones], or have you immunity in the scripture?
Or do they say, "We are an assembly supporting [each other]"?
[Their] assembly will be defeated, and they will turn their backs [in retreat].
But the Hour is their appointment [for due punishment], and the Hour is more disastrous and more bitter.
Indeed, the criminals are in error and madness.
The Day they are dragged into the Fire on their faces [it will be said], "Taste the touch of Saqar."
Indeed, all things We created with predestination.
And Our command is but one, like a glance of the eye.
And We have already destroyed your kinds, so is there any who will remember?
And everything they did is in written records.
And every small and great [thing] is inscribed.
Indeed, the righteous will be among gardens and rivers,
In a seat of honor near a Sovereign, Perfect in Ability.
The Most Merciful
Taught the Qur’an,
Created man,
[And] taught him eloquence.
The sun and the moon [move] by precise calculation,
And the stars and trees prostrate.
And the heaven He raised and imposed the balance
That you not transgress within the balance.
And establish weight in justice and do not make deficient the balance.
And the earth He laid [out] for the creatures.
Therein is fruit and palm trees having sheaths [of dates]
And grain having husks and scented plants.
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny?
He created man from clay like [that of] pottery.
And He created the jinn from a smokeless flame of fire.
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny?
[He is] Lord of the two sunrises and Lord of the two sunsets.
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny?
He released the two seas, meeting [side by side];
Between them is a barrier [so] neither of them transgresses.
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny?
From both of them emerge pearl and coral.
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny?
And to Him belong the ships [with sails] elevated in the sea like mountains.
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny?
Everyone upon the earth will perish,
And there will remain the Face of your Lord, Owner of Majesty and Honor.
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny?
Whoever is within the heavens and earth asks Him; every day He is bringing about a matter.
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny?
We will attend to you, O prominent beings.
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny?
O company of jinn and mankind, if you are able to pass beyond the regions of the heavens and the earth, then pass. You will not pass except by authority [from Allah].
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny?
There will be sent upon you a flame of fire and smoke, and you will not defend yourselves.
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny?
And when the heaven is split open and becomes rose-colored like oil -
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny? -
Then on that Day none will be asked about his sin among men or jinn.
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny?
The criminals will be known by their marks, and they will be seized by the forelocks and the feet.
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny?
This is Hell, which the criminals deny.
They will go around between it and scalding water, heated [to the utmost degree].
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny?
But for he who has feared the position of his Lord are two gardens -
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny? -
Having [spreading] branches.
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny?
In both of them are two springs, flowing.
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny?
In both of them are of every fruit, two kinds.
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny?
[They are] reclining on beds whose linings are of silk brocade, and the fruit of the two gardens is hanging low.
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny?
In them are women limiting [their] glances, untouched before them by man or jinni -
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny? -
As if they were rubies and coral.
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny?
Is the reward for good [anything] but good?
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny?
And below them both [in excellence] are two [other] gardens -
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny? -
Dark green [in color].
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny?
In both of them are two springs, spouting.
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny?
In both of them are fruit and palm trees and pomegranates.
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny?
In them are good and beautiful women -
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny? -
Fair ones reserved in pavilions -
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny? -
Untouched before them by man or jinni -
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny? -
Reclining on green cushions and beautiful fine carpets.
So which of the favors of your Lord would you deny?
Blessed is the name of your Lord, Owner of Majesty and Honor.
When the Occurrence occurs,
There is, at its occurrence, no denial.
It will bring down [some] and raise up [others].
When the earth is shaken with convulsion
And the mountains are broken down, crumbling
And become dust dispersing.
And you become [of] three kinds:
Then the companions of the right - what are the companions of the right?
And the companions of the left - what are the companions of the left?
And the forerunners, the forerunners -
Those are the ones brought near [to Allah]
In the Gardens of Pleasure,
A [large] company of the former peoples
And a few of the later peoples,
On thrones woven [with ornament],
Reclining on them, facing each other.
There will circulate among them young boys made eternal
With vessels, pitchers and a cup [of wine] from a flowing spring -
No headache will they have therefrom, nor will they be intoxicated -
And fruit of what they select
And the meat of fowl, from whatever they desire.
And [for them are] fair women with large, [beautiful] eyes,
The likenesses of pearls well-protected,
As reward for what they used to do.
They will not hear therein ill speech or commission of sin -
Only a saying: "Peace, peace."
The companions of the right - what are the companions of the right?
[They will be] among lote trees with thorns removed
And [banana] trees layered [with fruit]
And shade extended
And water poured out
And fruit, abundant [and varied],
Neither limited [to season] nor forbidden,
And [upon] beds raised high.
Indeed, We have produced the women of Paradise in a [new] creation
And made them virgins,
Devoted [to their husbands] and of equal age,
For the companions of the right [who are]
A company of the former peoples
And a company of the later peoples.
And the companions of the left - what are the companions of the left?
[They will be] in scorching fire and scalding water
And a shade of black smoke,
Neither cool nor beneficial.
Indeed they were, before that, indulging in affluence,
And they used to persist in the great violation,
And they used to say, "When we die and become dust and bones, are we indeed to be resurrected?
And our forefathers [as well]?"
Say, [O Muhammad], "Indeed, the former and the later peoples
Are to be gathered together for the appointment of a known Day."
Then indeed you, O those astray [who are] deniers,
Will be eating from trees of zaqqum
And filling with it your bellies
And drinking on top of it from scalding water
And will drink as the drinking of thirsty camels.
That is their accommodation on the Day of Recompense.
We have created you, so why do you not believe?
Have you seen that which you emit?
Is it you who creates it, or are We the Creator?
We have decreed death among you, and We are not to be outdone
In that We will change your likenesses and produce you in that [form] which you do not know.
And you have already known the first creation, so will you not remember?
And have you seen that [seed] which you sow?
Is it you who makes it grow, or are We the grower?
If We willed, We could make it [dry] debris, and you would remain in wonder,
[Saying], "Indeed, we are [now] in debt;
Rather, we have been deprived."
And have you seen the water that you drink?
Is it you who brought it down from the clouds, or is it We who bring it down?
If We willed, We could make it bitter, so why are you not grateful?
And have you seen the fire that you ignite?
Is it you who produced its tree, or are We the producer?
We have made it a reminder and provision for the travelers,
So exalt the name of your Lord, the Most Great.
Then I swear by the setting of the stars,
And indeed, it is an oath - if you could know - [most] great.
Indeed, it is a noble Qur’an
In a Register well-protected;
None touch it except the purified.
[It is] a revelation from the Lord of the worlds.
Then is it to this statement that you are indifferent
And make [the thanks for] your provision that you deny [the Provider]?
Then why, when the soul at death reaches the throat
And you are at that time looking on -
And Our angels are nearer to him than you, but you do not see -
Then why do you not, if you are not to be recompensed,
Bring it back, if you should be truthful?
And if the deceased was of those brought near to Allah,
Then [for him is] rest and bounty and a garden of pleasure.
And if he was of the companions of the right,
Then [the angels will say], "Peace for you; [you are] from the companions of the right."
But if he was of the deniers [who were] astray,
Then [for him is] accommodation of scalding water
And burning in Hellfire
Indeed, this is the true certainty,
So exalt the name of your Lord, the Most Great.
Whatever is in the heavens and earth exalts Allah, and He is the Exalted in Might, the Wise.
His is the dominion of the heavens and earth. He gives life and causes death, and He is over all things competent.
He is the First and the Last, the Ascendant and the Intimate, and He is, of all things, Knowing.
It is He who created the heavens and earth in six days and then established Himself above the Throne. He knows what penetrates into the earth and what emerges from it and what descends from the heaven and what ascends therein; and He is with you wherever you are. And Allah, of what you do, is Seeing.
His is the dominion of the heavens and earth. And to Allah are returned [all] matters.
He causes the night to enter the day and causes the day to enter the night, and he is Knowing of that within the breasts.
Believe in Allah and His Messenger and spend out of that in which He has made you successors. For those who have believed among you and spent, there will be a great reward.
And why do you not believe in Allah while the Messenger invites you to believe in your Lord and He has taken your covenant, if you should [truly] be believers?
It is He who sends down upon His Servant [Muhammad] verses of clear evidence that He may bring you out from darknesses into the light. And indeed, Allah is to you Kind and Merciful.
And why do you not spend in the cause of Allah while to Allah belongs the heritage of the heavens and the earth? Not equal among you are those who spent before the conquest [of Makkah] and fought [and those who did so after it]. Those are greater in degree than they who spent afterwards and fought. But to all Allah has promised the best [reward]. And Allah, with what you do, is Acquainted.
Who is it that would loan Allah a goodly loan so He will multiply it for him and he will have a noble reward?
On the Day you see the believing men and believing women, their light proceeding before them and on their right, [it will be said], "Your good tidings today are [of] gardens beneath which rivers flow, wherein you will abide eternally." That is what is the great attainment.
On the [same] Day the hypocrite men and hypocrite women will say to those who believed, "Wait for us that we may acquire some of your light." It will be said, "Go back behind you and seek light." And a wall will be placed between them with a door, its interior containing mercy, but on the outside of it is torment.
The hypocrites will call to the believers, "Were we not with you?" They will say, "Yes, but you afflicted yourselves and awaited [misfortune for us] and doubted, and wishful thinking deluded you until there came the command of Allah. And the Deceiver deceived you concerning Allah.
So today no ransom will be taken from you or from those who disbelieved. Your refuge is the Fire. It is most worthy of you, and wretched is the destination.
Has the time not come for those who have believed that their hearts should become humbly submissive at the remembrance of Allah and what has come down of the truth? And let them not be like those who were given the Scripture before, and a long period passed over them, so their hearts hardened; and many of them are defiantly disobedient.
Know that Allah gives life to the earth after its lifelessness. We have made clear to you the signs; perhaps you will understand.
Indeed, the men who practice charity and the women who practice charity and [they who] have loaned Allah a goodly loan - it will be multiplied for them, and they will have a noble reward.
And those who have believed in Allah and His messengers - those are [in the ranks of] the supporters of truth and the martyrs, with their Lord. For them is their reward and their light. But those who have disbelieved and denied Our verses - those are the companions of Hellfire.
Know that the life of this world is but amusement and diversion and adornment and boasting to one another and competition in increase of wealth and children - like the example of a rain whose [resulting] plant growth pleases the tillers; then it dries and you see it turned yellow; then it becomes [scattered] debris. And in the Hereafter is severe punishment and forgiveness from Allah and approval. And what is the worldly life except the enjoyment of delusion.
Race toward forgiveness from your Lord and a Garden whose width is like the width of the heavens and earth, prepared for those who believed in Allah and His messengers. That is the bounty of Allah which He gives to whom He wills, and Allah is the possessor of great bounty.
No disaster strikes upon the earth or among yourselves except that it is in a register before We bring it into being - indeed that, for Allah, is easy -
In order that you not despair over what has eluded you and not exult [in pride] over what He has given you. And Allah does not like everyone self-deluded and boastful -
[Those] who are stingy and enjoin upon people stinginess. And whoever turns away - then indeed, Allah is the Free of need, the Praiseworthy.
We have already sent Our messengers with clear evidences and sent down with them the Scripture and the balance that the people may maintain [their affairs] in justice. And We sent down iron, wherein is great military might and benefits for the people, and so that Allah may make evident those who support Him and His messengers unseen. Indeed, Allah is Powerful and Exalted in Might.
And We have already sent Noah and Abraham and placed in their descendants prophethood and scripture; and among them is he who is guided, but many of them are defiantly disobedient.
Then We sent following their footsteps Our messengers and followed [them] with Jesus, the son of Mary, and gave him the Gospel. And We placed in the hearts of those who followed him compassion and mercy and monasticism, which they innovated; We did not prescribe it for them except [that they did so] seeking the approval of Allah. But they did not observe it with due observance. So We gave the ones who believed among them their reward, but many of them are defiantly disobedient.
O you who have believed, fear Allah and believe in His Messenger; He will [then] give you a double portion of His mercy and make for you a light by which you will walk and forgive you; and Allah is Forgiving and Merciful.
[This is] so that the People of the Scripture may know that they are not able [to obtain] anything from the bounty of Allah and that [all] bounty is in the hand of Allah; He gives it to whom He wills. And Allah is the possessor of great bounty.
Certainly has Allah heard the speech of the one who argues with you, [O Muhammad], concerning her husband and directs her complaint to Allah. And Allah hears your dialogue; indeed, Allah is Hearing and Seeing.
Those who pronounce thihar among you [to separate] from their wives - they are not [consequently] their mothers. Their mothers are none but those who gave birth to them. And indeed, they are saying an objectionable statement and a falsehood. But indeed, Allah is Pardoning and Forgiving.
And those who pronounce thihar from their wives and then [wish to] go back on what they said - then [there must be] the freeing of a slave before they touch one another. That is what you are admonished thereby; and Allah is Acquainted with what you do.
And he who does not find [a slave] - then a fast for two months consecutively before they touch one another; and he who is unable - then the feeding of sixty poor persons. That is for you to believe [completely] in Allah and His Messenger; and those are the limits [set by] Allah. And for the disbelievers is a painful punishment.
Indeed, those who oppose Allah and His Messenger are abased as those before them were abased. And We have certainly sent down verses of clear evidence. And for the disbelievers is a humiliating punishment.
On the Day when Allah will resurrect them all and inform them of what they did. Allah had enumerated it, while they forgot it; and Allah is, over all things, Witness.
Have you not considered that Allah knows what is in the heavens and what is on the earth? There is in no private conversation three but that He is the fourth of them, nor are there five but that He is the sixth of them - and no less than that and no more except that He is with them [in knowledge] wherever they are. Then He will inform them of what they did, on the Day of Resurrection. Indeed Allah is, of all things, Knowing.
Have you not considered those who were forbidden from private conversation, then they return to that which they were forbidden and converse among themselves about sin and aggression and disobedience to the Messenger? And when they come to you, they greet you with that [word] by which Allah does not greet you and say among themselves, "Why does Allah not punish us for what we say?" Sufficient for them is Hell, which they will [enter to] burn, and wretched is the destination.
O you who have believed, when you converse privately, do not converse about sin and aggression and disobedience to the Messenger but converse about righteousness and piety. And fear Allah, to whom you will be gathered.
Private conversation is only from Satan that he may grieve those who have believed, but he will not harm them at all except by permission of Allah. And upon Allah let the believers rely.
O you who have believed, when you are told, "Space yourselves" in assemblies, then make space; Allah will make space for you. And when you are told, "Arise," then arise; Allah will raise those who have believed among you and those who were given knowledge, by degrees. And Allah is Acquainted with what you do.
O you who have believed, when you [wish to] privately consult the Messenger, present before your consultation a charity. That is better for you and purer. But if you find not [the means] - then indeed, Allah is Forgiving and Merciful.
Have you feared to present before your consultation charities? Then when you do not and Allah has forgiven you, then [at least] establish prayer and give zakah and obey Allah and His Messenger. And Allah is Acquainted with what you do.
Have you not considered those who make allies of a people with whom Allah has become angry? They are neither of you nor of them, and they swear to untruth while they know [they are lying].
Allah has prepared for them a severe punishment. Indeed, it was evil that they were doing.
They took their [false] oaths as a cover, so they averted [people] from the way of Allah, and for them is a humiliating punishment.
Never will their wealth or their children avail them against Allah at all. Those are the companions of the Fire; they will abide therein eternally
On the Day Allah will resurrect them all, and they will swear to Him as they swear to you and think that they are [standing] on something. Unquestionably, it is they who are the liars.
Satan has overcome them and made them forget the remembrance of Allah. Those are the party of Satan. Unquestionably, the party of Satan - they will be the losers.
Indeed, the ones who oppose Allah and His Messenger - those will be among the most humbled.
Allah has written, "I will surely overcome, I and My messengers." Indeed, Allah is Powerful and Exalted in Might.
You will not find a people who believe in Allah and the Last Day having affection for those who oppose Allah and His Messenger, even if they were their fathers or their sons or their brothers or their kindred. Those - He has decreed within their hearts faith and supported them with spirit from Him. And We will admit them to gardens beneath which rivers flow, wherein they abide eternally. Allah is pleased with them, and they are pleased with Him - those are the party of Allah. Unquestionably, the party of Allah - they are the successful.
Whatever is in the heavens and whatever is on the earth exalts Allah, and He is the Exalted in Might, the Wise.
It is He who expelled the ones who disbelieved among the People of the Scripture from their homes at the first gathering. You did not think they would leave, and they thought that their fortresses would protect them from Allah; but [the decree of] Allah came upon them from where they had not expected, and He cast terror into their hearts [so] they destroyed their houses by their [own] hands and the hands of the believers. So take warning, O people of vision.
And if not that Allah had decreed for them evacuation, He would have punished them in [this] world, and for them in the Hereafter is the punishment of the Fire.
That is because they opposed Allah and His Messenger. And whoever opposes Allah - then indeed, Allah is severe in penalty.
Whatever you have cut down of [their] palm trees or left standing on their trunks - it was by permission of Allah and so He would disgrace the defiantly disobedient.
And what Allah restored [of property] to His Messenger from them - you did not spur for it [in an expedition] any horses or camels, but Allah gives His messengers power over whom He wills, and Allah is over all things competent.
And what Allah restored to His Messenger from the people of the towns - it is for Allah and for the Messenger and for [his] near relatives and orphans and the [stranded] traveler - so that it will not be a perpetual distribution among the rich from among you. And whatever the Messenger has given you - take; and what he has forbidden you - refrain from. And fear Allah; indeed, Allah is severe in penalty.
For the poor emigrants who were expelled from their homes and their properties, seeking bounty from Allah and [His] approval and supporting Allah and His Messenger, [there is also a share]. Those are the truthful.
And [also for] those who were settled in al-Madinah and [adopted] the faith before them. They love those who emigrated to them and find not any want in their breasts of what the emigrants were given but give [them] preference over themselves, even though they are in privation. And whoever is protected from the stinginess of his soul - it is those who will be the successful.
And [there is a share for] those who came after them, saying, "Our Lord, forgive us and our brothers who preceded us in faith and put not in our hearts [any] resentment toward those who have believed. Our Lord, indeed You are Kind and Merciful."
Have you not considered those who practice hypocrisy, saying to their brothers who have disbelieved among the People of the Scripture, "If you are expelled, we will surely leave with you, and we will not obey, in regard to you, anyone - ever; and if you are fought, we will surely aid you." But Allah testifies that they are liars.
If they are expelled, they will not leave with them, and if they are fought, they will not aid them. And [even] if they should aid them, they will surely turn their backs; then [thereafter] they will not be aided.
You [believers] are more fearful within their breasts than Allah. That is because they are a people who do not understand.
They will not fight you all except within fortified cities or from behind walls. Their violence among themselves is severe. You think they are together, but their hearts are diverse. That is because they are a people who do not reason.
[Theirs is] like the example of those shortly before them: they tasted the bad consequence of their affair, and they will have a painful punishment.
[The hypocrites are] like the example of Satan when he says to man, "Disbelieve." But when he disbelieves, he says, "Indeed, I am disassociated from you. Indeed, I fear Allah, Lord of the worlds."
So the outcome for both of them is that they will be in the Fire, abiding eternally therein. And that is the recompense of the wrong-doers.
O you who have believed, fear Allah. And let every soul look to what it has put forth for tomorrow - and fear Allah. Indeed, Allah is Acquainted with what you do.
And be not like those who forgot Allah, so He made them forget themselves. Those are the defiantly disobedient.
Not equal are the companions of the Fire and the companions of Paradise. The companions of Paradise - they are the attainers [of success].
If We had sent down this Qur’an upon a mountain, you would have seen it humbled and coming apart from fear of Allah. And these examples We present to the people that perhaps they will give thought.
He is Allah, other than whom there is no deity, Knower of the unseen and the witnessed. He is the Entirely Merciful, the Especially Merciful.
He is Allah, other than whom there is no deity, the Sovereign, the Pure, the Perfection, the Bestower of Faith, the Overseer, the Exalted in Might, the Compeller, the Superior. Exalted is Allah above whatever they associate with Him.
He is Allah, the Creator, the Inventor, the Fashioner; to Him belong the best names. Whatever is in the heavens and earth is exalting Him. And He is the Exalted in Might, the Wise.
O you who have believed, do not take My enemies and your enemies as allies, extending to them affection while they have disbelieved in what came to you of the truth, having driven out the Prophet and yourselves [only] because you believe in Allah, your Lord. If you have come out for jihad in My cause and seeking means to My approval, [take them not as friends]. You confide to them affection, but I am most knowing of what you have concealed and what you have declared. And whoever does it among you has certainly strayed from the soundness of the way.
If they gain dominance over you, they would be to you as enemies and extend against you their hands and their tongues with evil, and they wish you would disbelieve.
Never will your relatives or your children benefit you; the Day of Resurrection He will judge between you. And Allah, of what you do, is Seeing.
There has already been for you an excellent pattern in Abraham and those with him, when they said to their people, "Indeed, we are disassociated from you and from whatever you worship other than Allah. We have denied you, and there has appeared between us and you animosity and hatred forever until you believe in Allah alone" except for the saying of Abraham to his father, "I will surely ask forgiveness for you, but I have not [power to do] for you anything against Allah. Our Lord, upon You we have relied, and to You we have returned, and to You is the destination.
Our Lord, make us not [objects of] torment for the disbelievers and forgive us, our Lord. Indeed, it is You who is the Exalted in Might, the Wise."
There has certainly been for you in them an excellent pattern for anyone whose hope is in Allah and the Last Day. And whoever turns away - then indeed, Allah is the Free of need, the Praiseworthy.
Perhaps Allah will put, between you and those to whom you have been enemies among them, affection. And Allah is competent, and Allah is Forgiving and Merciful.
Allah does not forbid you from those who do not fight you because of religion and do not expel you from your homes - from being righteous toward them and acting justly toward them. Indeed, Allah loves those who act justly.
Allah only forbids you from those who fight you because of religion and expel you from your homes and aid in your expulsion - [forbids] that you make allies of them. And whoever makes allies of them, then it is those who are the wrongdoers.
O you who have believed, when the believing women come to you as emigrants, examine them. Allah is most knowing as to their faith. And if you know them to be believers, then do not return them to the disbelievers; they are not lawful [wives] for them, nor are they lawful [husbands] for them. But give the disbelievers what they have spent. And there is no blame upon you if you marry them when you have given them their due compensation. And hold not to marriage bonds with disbelieving women, but ask for what you have spent and let them ask for what they have spent. That is the judgement of Allah; He judges between you. And Allah is Knowing and Wise.
And if you have lost any of your wives to the disbelievers and you subsequently obtain [something], then give those whose wives have gone the equivalent of what they had spent. And fear Allah, in whom you are believers.
O Prophet, when the believing women come to you pledging to you that they will not associate anything with Allah, nor will they steal, nor will they commit unlawful sexual intercourse, nor will they kill their children, nor will they bring forth a slander they have invented between their arms and legs, nor will they disobey you in what is right - then accept their pledge and ask forgiveness for them of Allah. Indeed, Allah is Forgiving and Merciful.
O you who have believed, do not make allies of a people with whom Allah has become angry. They have despaired of [reward in] the Hereafter just as the disbelievers have despaired of [meeting] the inhabitants of the graves.
Whatever is in the heavens and whatever is on the earth exalts Allah, and He is the Exalted in Might, the Wise.
O you who have believed, why do you say what you do not do?
Great is hatred in the sight of Allah that you say what you do not do.
Indeed, Allah loves those who fight in His cause in a row as though they are a [single] structure joined firmly.
And [mention, O Muhammad], when Moses said to his people, "O my people, why do you harm me while you certainly know that I am the messenger of Allah to you?" And when they deviated, Allah caused their hearts to deviate. And Allah does not guide the defiantly disobedient people.
And [mention] when Jesus, the son of Mary, said, "O children of Israel, indeed I am the messenger of Allah to you confirming what came before me of the Torah and bringing good tidings of a messenger to come after me, whose name is Ahmad." But when he came to them with clear evidences, they said, "This is obvious magic."
And who is more unjust than one who invents about Allah untruth while he is being invited to Islam. And Allah does not guide the wrongdoing people.
They want to extinguish the light of Allah with their mouths, but Allah will perfect His light, although the disbelievers dislike it.
It is He who sent His Messenger with guidance and the religion of truth to manifest it over all religion, although those who associate others with Allah dislike it.
O you who have believed, shall I guide you to a transaction that will save you from a painful punishment?
[It is that] you believe in Allah and His Messenger and strive in the cause of Allah with your wealth and your lives. That is best for you, if you should know.
He will forgive for you your sins and admit you to gardens beneath which rivers flow and pleasant dwellings in gardens of perpetual residence. That is the great attainment.
And [you will obtain] another [favor] that you love - victory from Allah and an imminent conquest; and give good tidings to the believers.
O you who have believed, be supporters of Allah, as when Jesus, the son of Mary, said to the disciples, "Who are my supporters for Allah?" The disciples said, "We are supporters of Allah." And a faction of the Children of Israel believed and a faction disbelieved. So We supported those who believed against their enemy, and they became dominant.
Whatever is in the heavens and whatever is on the earth is exalting Allah, the Sovereign, the Pure, the Exalted in Might, the Wise.
It is He who has sent among the unlettered a Messenger from themselves reciting to them His verses and purifying them and teaching them the Book and wisdom - although they were before in clear error -
And [to] others of them who have not yet joined them. And He is the Exalted in Might, the Wise.
That is the bounty of Allah, which He gives to whom He wills, and Allah is the possessor of great bounty.
The example of those who were entrusted with the Torah and then did not take it on is like that of a donkey who carries volumes [of books]. Wretched is the example of the people who deny the signs of Allah. And Allah does not guide the wrongdoing people.
Say, "O you who are Jews, if you claim that you are allies of Allah, excluding the [other] people, then wish for death, if you should be truthful."
But they will not wish for it, ever, because of what their hands have put forth. And Allah is Knowing of the wrongdoers.
Say, "Indeed, the death from which you flee - indeed, it will meet you. Then you will be returned to the Knower of the unseen and the witnessed, and He will inform you about what you used to do."
O you who have believed, when [the adhan] is called for the prayer on the day of Jumu‘ah [Friday], then proceed to the remembrance of Allah and leave trade. That is better for you, if you only knew.
And when the prayer has been concluded, disperse within the land and seek from the bounty of Allah, and remember Allah often that you may succeed.
But when they saw a transaction or a diversion, [O Muhammad], they rushed to it and left you standing. Say, "What is with Allah is better than diversion and than a transaction, and Allah is the best of providers."
When the hypocrites come to you, [O Muhammad], they say, "We testify that you are the Messenger of Allah." And Allah knows that you are His Messenger, and Allah testifies that the hypocrites are liars.
They have taken their oaths as a cover, so they averted [people] from the way of Allah. Indeed, it was evil that they were doing.
That is because they believed, and then they disbelieved; so their hearts were sealed over, and they do not understand.
And when you see them, their forms please you, and if they speak, you listen to their speech. [They are] as if they were pieces of wood propped up - they think that every shout is against them. They are the enemy, so beware of them. May Allah destroy them; how are they deluded?
And when it is said to them, "Come, the Messenger of Allah will ask forgiveness for you," they turn their heads aside and you see them evading while they are arrogant.
It is all the same for them whether you ask forgiveness for them or do not ask forgiveness for them; never will Allah forgive them. Indeed, Allah does not guide the defiantly disobedient people.
They are the ones who say, "Do not spend on those who are with the Messenger of Allah until they disband." And to Allah belongs the depositories of the heavens and the earth, but the hypocrites do not understand.
They say, "If we return to al-Madinah, the more honored [for power] will surely expel therefrom the more humble." And to Allah belongs [all] honor, and to His Messenger, and to the believers, but the hypocrites do not know.
O you who have believed, let not your wealth and your children divert you from remembrance of Allah. And whoever does that - then those are the losers.
And spend [in the way of Allah] from what We have provided you before death approaches one of you and he says, "My Lord, if only You would delay me for a brief term so I would give charity and be among the righteous."
But never will Allah delay a soul when its time has come. And Allah is Acquainted with what you do.
Whatever is in the heavens and whatever is on the earth is exalting Allah. To Him belongs dominion, and to Him belongs [all] praise, and He is over all things competent.
It is He who created you, and among you is the disbeliever, and among you is the believer. And Allah, of what you do, is Seeing.
He created the heavens and earth in truth and formed you and perfected your forms; and to Him is the [final] destination.
He knows what is within the heavens and earth and knows what you conceal and what you declare. And Allah is Knowing of that within the breasts.
Has there not come to you the news of those who disbelieved before? So they tasted the bad consequence of their affair, and they will have a painful punishment.
That is because their messengers used to come to them with clear evidences, but they said, "Shall human beings guide us?" and disbelieved and turned away. And Allah dispensed [with them]; and Allah is Free of need and Praiseworthy.
Those who disbelieve have claimed that they will never be resurrected. Say, "Yes, by my Lord, you will surely be resurrected; then you will surely be informed of what you did. And that, for Allah, is easy."
So believe in Allah and His Messenger and the Qur’an which We have sent down. And Allah is Acquainted with what you do.
The Day He will assemble you for the Day of Assembly - that is the Day of Deprivation. And whoever believes in Allah and does righteousness - He will remove from him his misdeeds and admit him to gardens beneath which rivers flow, wherein they will abide forever. That is the great attainment.
But the ones who disbelieved and denied Our verses - those are the companions of the Fire, abiding eternally therein; and wretched is the destination.
No disaster strikes except by permission of Allah. And whoever believes in Allah - He will guide his heart. And Allah is Knowing of all things.
And obey Allah and obey the Messenger; but if you turn away - then upon Our Messenger is only [the duty of] clear notification.
Allah - there is no deity except Him. And upon Allah let the believers rely.
O you who have believed, indeed, among your wives and your children are enemies to you, so beware of them. But if you pardon and overlook and forgive - then indeed, Allah is Forgiving and Merciful.
Your wealth and your children are but a trial, and Allah has with Him a great reward.
So fear Allah as much as you are able and listen and obey and spend [in the way of Allah]; it is better for your selves. And whoever is protected from the stinginess of his soul - it is those who will be the successful.
If you loan Allah a goodly loan, He will multiply it for you and forgive you. And Allah is Most Appreciative and Forbearing.
Knower of the unseen and the witnessed, the Exalted in Might, the Wise.
O Prophet, when you [Muslims] divorce women, divorce them for [the commencement of] their waiting period and keep count of the waiting period, and fear Allah, your Lord. Do not turn them out of their [husbands'] houses, nor should they [themselves] leave [during that period] unless they are committing a clear immorality. And those are the limits [set by] Allah. And whoever transgresses the limits of Allah has certainly wronged himself. You know not; perhaps Allah will bring about after that a [different] matter.
And when they have [nearly] fulfilled their term, either retain them according to acceptable terms or part with them according to acceptable terms. And bring to witness two just men from among you and establish the testimony for [the acceptance of] Allah. That is instructed to whoever should believe in Allah and the Last day. And whoever fears Allah - He will make for him a way out
And will provide for him from where he does not expect. And whoever relies upon Allah - then He is sufficient for him. Indeed, Allah will accomplish His purpose. Allah has already set for everything a [decreed] extent.
And those who no longer expect menstruation among your women - if you doubt, then their period is three months, and [also for] those who have not menstruated. And for those who are pregnant, their term is until they give birth. And whoever fears Allah - He will make for him of his matter ease.
That is the command of Allah, which He has sent down to you; and whoever fears Allah - He will remove for him his misdeeds and make great for him his reward.
Lodge them [in a section] of where you dwell out of your means and do not harm them in order to oppress them. And if they should be pregnant, then spend on them until they give birth. And if they breastfeed for you, then give them their payment and confer among yourselves in the acceptable way; but if you are in discord, then there may breastfeed for the father another woman.
Let a man of wealth spend from his wealth, and he whose provision is restricted - let him spend from what Allah has given him. Allah does not charge a soul except [according to] what He has given it. Allah will bring about, after hardship, ease.
And how many a city was insolent toward the command of its Lord and His messengers, so We took it to severe account and punished it with a terrible punishment.
And it tasted the bad consequence of its affair, and the outcome of its affair was loss.
Allah has prepared for them a severe punishment; so fear Allah, O you of understanding who have believed. Allah has sent down to you the Qur’an.
[He sent] a Messenger [Muhammad] reciting to you the distinct verses of Allah that He may bring out those who believe and do righteous deeds from darknesses into the light. And whoever believes in Allah and does righteousness - He will admit him into gardens beneath which rivers flow to abide therein forever. Allah will have perfected for him a provision.
It is Allah who has created seven heavens and of the earth, the like of them. [His] command descends among them so you may know that Allah is over all things competent and that Allah has encompassed all things in knowledge.
O Prophet, why do you prohibit [yourself from] what Allah has made lawful for you, seeking the approval of your wives? And Allah is Forgiving and Merciful.
Allah has already ordained for you [Muslims] the dissolution of your oaths. And Allah is your protector, and He is the Knowing, the Wise.
And [remember] when the Prophet confided to one of his wives a statement; and when she informed [another] of it and Allah showed it to him, he made known part of it and ignored a part. And when he informed her about it, she said, "Who told you this?" He said, "I was informed by the Knowing, the Acquainted."
If you two [wives] repent to Allah, [it is best], for your hearts have deviated. But if you cooperate against him - then indeed Allah is his protector, and Gabriel and the righteous of the believers and the angels, moreover, are [his] assistants.
Perhaps his Lord, if he divorced you [all], would substitute for him wives better than you - submitting [to Allah], believing, devoutly obedient, repentant, worshipping, and traveling - [ones] previously married and virgins.
O you who have believed, protect yourselves and your families from a Fire whose fuel is people and stones, over which are [appointed] angels, harsh and severe; they do not disobey Allah in what He commands them but do what they are commanded.
O you who have disbelieved, make no excuses that Day. You will only be recompensed for what you used to do.
O you who have believed, repent to Allah with sincere repentance. Perhaps your Lord will remove from you your misdeeds and admit you into gardens beneath which rivers flow [on] the Day when Allah will not disgrace the Prophet and those who believed with him. Their light will proceed before them and on their right; they will say, "Our Lord, perfect for us our light and forgive us. Indeed, You are over all things competent."
O Prophet, strive against the disbelievers and the hypocrites and be harsh upon them. And their refuge is Hell, and wretched is the destination.
Allah presents an example of those who disbelieved: the wife of Noah and the wife of Lot. They were under two of Our righteous servants but betrayed them, so those prophets did not avail them from Allah at all, and it was said, "Enter the Fire with those who enter."
And Allah presents an example of those who believed: the wife of Pharaoh, when she said, "My Lord, build for me near You a house in Paradise and save me from Pharaoh and his deeds and save me from the wrongdoing people."
And [the example of] Mary, the daughter of ‘Imran, who guarded her chastity, so We blew into [her garment] through Our angel, and she believed in the words of her Lord and His scriptures and was of the devoutly obedient.
Blessed is He in whose hand is dominion, and He is over all things competent -
[He] who created death and life to test you [as to] which of you is best in deed - and He is the Exalted in Might, the Forgiving -
[And] who created seven heavens in layers. You do not see in the creation of the Most Merciful any inconsistency. So return [your] vision [to the sky]; do you see any breaks?
Then return [your] vision twice again. [Your] vision will return to you humbled while it is fatigued.
And We have certainly beautified the nearest heaven with stars and have made [from] them what is thrown at the devils and have prepared for them the punishment of the Blaze.
And for those who disbelieved in their Lord is the punishment of Hell, and wretched is the destination.
When they are thrown into it, they hear from it a [dreadful] inhaling while it boils up.
It almost bursts with rage. Every time a company is thrown into it, its keepers ask them, "Did there not come to you a warner?"
They will say," Yes, a warner had come to us, but we denied and said, 'Allah has not sent down anything. You are not but in great error.' "
And they will say, "If only we had been listening or reasoning, we would not be among the companions of the Blaze."
And they will admit their sin, so [it is] alienation for the companions of the Blaze.
Indeed, those who fear their Lord unseen will have forgiveness and great reward.
And conceal your speech or publicize it; indeed, He is Knowing of that within the breasts.
Does He who created not know, while He is the Subtle, the Acquainted?
It is He who made the earth tame for you - so walk among its slopes and eat of His provision - and to Him is the resurrection.
Do you feel secure that He who [holds authority] in the heaven would not cause the earth to swallow you and suddenly it would sway?
Or do you feel secure that He who [holds authority] in the heaven would not send against you a storm of stones? Then you would know how [severe] was My warning.
And already had those before them denied, and how [terrible] was My reproach.
Do they not see the birds above them with wings outspread and [sometimes] folded in? None holds them [aloft] except the Most Merciful. Indeed He is, of all things, Seeing.
Or who is it that could be an army for you to aid you other than the Most Merciful? The disbelievers are not but in delusion.
Or who is it that could provide for you if He withheld His provision? But they have persisted in insolence and aversion.
Then is one who walks fallen on his face better guided or one who walks erect on a straight path?
Say, "It is He who has produced you and made for you hearing and vision and hearts; little are you grateful."
Say, " It is He who has multiplied you throughout the earth, and to Him you will be gathered."
And they say, "When is this promise, if you should be truthful?"
Say, "The knowledge is only with Allah, and I am only a clear warner."
But when they see it approaching, the faces of those who disbelieve will be distressed, and it will be said, "This is that for which you used to call."
Say, [O Muhammad], "Have you considered: whether Allah should cause my death and those with me or have mercy upon us, who can protect the disbelievers from a painful punishment?"
Say, "He is the Most Merciful; we have believed in Him, and upon Him we have relied. And you will [come to] know who it is that is in clear error."
Say, "Have you considered: if your water was to become sunken [into the earth], then who could bring you flowing water?"
Nun. By the pen and what they inscribe,
You are not, [O Muhammad], by the favor of your Lord, a madman.
And indeed, for you is a reward uninterrupted.
And indeed, you are of a great moral character.
So you will see and they will see
Which of you is the afflicted [by a devil].
Indeed, your Lord is most knowing of who has gone astray from His way, and He is most knowing of the [rightly] guided.
Then do not obey the deniers.
They wish that you would soften [in your position], so they would soften [toward you].
And do not obey every worthless habitual swearer
[And] scorner, going about with malicious gossip -
A preventer of good, transgressing and sinful,
Cruel, moreover, and an illegitimate pretender.
Because he is a possessor of wealth and children,
When Our verses are recited to him, he says, "Legends of the former peoples."
We will brand him upon the snout.
Indeed, We have tried them as We tried the companions of the garden, when they swore to cut its fruit in the [early] morning
Without making exception.
So there came upon the garden an affliction from your Lord while they were asleep.
And it became as though reaped.
And they called one another at morning,
[Saying], "Go early to your crop if you would cut the fruit."
So they set out, while lowering their voices,
[Saying], "There will surely not enter it today upon you [any] poor person."
And they went early in determination, [assuming themselves] able.
But when they saw it, they said, "Indeed, we are lost;
Rather, we have been deprived."
The most moderate of them said, "Did I not say to you, 'Why do you not exalt [Allah]?' "
They said, "Exalted is our Lord! Indeed, we were wrongdoers."
Then they approached one another, blaming each other.
They said, "O woe to us; indeed we were transgressors.
Perhaps our Lord will substitute for us [one] better than it. Indeed, we are toward our Lord desirous."
Such is the punishment [of this world]. And the punishment of the Hereafter is greater, if they only knew.
Indeed, for the righteous with their Lord are the Gardens of Pleasure.
Then will We treat the Muslims like the criminals?
What is [the matter] with you? How do you judge?
Or do you have a scripture in which you learn
That indeed for you is whatever you choose?
Or do you have oaths [binding] upon Us, extending until the Day of Resurrection, that indeed for you is whatever you judge?
Ask them which of them, for that [claim], is responsible.
Or do they have partners? Then let them bring their partners, if they should be truthful.
The Day the shin will be uncovered and they are invited to prostration but the disbelievers will not be able,
Their eyes humbled, humiliation will cover them. And they used to be invited to prostration while they were sound.
So leave Me, [O Muhammad], with [the matter of] whoever denies the Qur’an. We will progressively lead them [to punishment] from where they do not know.
And I will give them time. Indeed, My plan is firm.
Or do you ask of them a payment, so they are by debt burdened down?
Or have they [knowledge of] the unseen, so they write [it] down?
Then be patient for the decision of your Lord, [O Muhammad], and be not like the companion of the fish when he called out while he was distressed.
If not that a favor from his Lord overtook him, he would have been thrown onto the naked shore while he was censured.
And his Lord chose him and made him of the righteous.
And indeed, those who disbelieve would almost make you slip with their eyes when they hear the message, and they say, "Indeed, he is mad."
But it is not except a reminder to the worlds.
The Inevitable Reality -
What is the Inevitable Reality?
And what can make you know what is the Inevitable Reality?
Thamud and ‘Aad denied the Striking Calamity.
So as for Thamud, they were destroyed by the overpowering [blast].
And as for ‘Aad, they were destroyed by a screaming, violent wind
Which Allah imposed upon them for seven nights and eight days in succession, so you would see the people therein fallen as if they were hollow trunks of palm trees.
Then do you see of them any remains?
And there came Pharaoh and those before him and the overturned cities with sin.
And they disobeyed the messenger of their Lord, so He seized them with a seizure exceeding [in severity].
Indeed, when the water overflowed, We carried your ancestors in the sailing ship
That We might make it for you a reminder and [that] a conscious ear would be conscious of it.
Then when the Horn is blown with one blast
And the earth and the mountains are lifted and leveled with one blow -
Then on that Day, the Resurrection will occur,
And the heaven will split [open], for that Day it is infirm.
And the angels are at its edges. And there will bear the Throne of your Lord above them, that Day, eight [of them].
That Day, you will be exhibited [for judgement]; not hidden among you is anything concealed.
So as for he who is given his record in his right hand, he will say, "Here, read my record!
Indeed, I was certain that I would be meeting my account."
So he will be in a pleasant life -
In an elevated garden,
Its [fruit] to be picked hanging near.
[They will be told], "Eat and drink in satisfaction for what you put forth in the days past."
But as for he who is given his record in his left hand, he will say, "Oh, I wish I had not been given my record
And had not known what is my account.
I wish my death had been the decisive one.
My wealth has not availed me.
Gone from me is my authority."
[Allah will say], "Seize him and shackle him.
Then into Hellfire drive him.
Then into a chain whose length is seventy cubits insert him."
Indeed, he did not used to believe in Allah, the Most Great,
Nor did he encourage the feeding of the poor.
So there is not for him here this Day any devoted friend
Nor any food except from the discharge of wounds;
None will eat it except the sinners.
So I swear by what you see
And what you do not see
[That] indeed, the Qur’an is the word of a noble Messenger.
And it is not the word of a poet; little do you believe.
Nor the word of a soothsayer; little do you remember.
[It is] a revelation from the Lord of the worlds.
And if Muhammad had made up about Us some [false] sayings,
We would have seized him by the right hand;
Then We would have cut from him the aorta.
And there is no one of you who could prevent [Us] from him.
And indeed, the Qur’an is a reminder for the righteous.
And indeed, We know that among you are deniers.
And indeed, it will be [a cause of] regret upon the disbelievers.
And indeed, it is the truth of certainty.
So exalt the name of your Lord, the Most Great.
A supplicant asked for a punishment bound to happen
To the disbelievers; of it there is no preventer.
[It is] from Allah, owner of the ways of ascent.
The angels and the Spirit will ascend to Him during a Day the extent of which is fifty thousand years.
So be patient with gracious patience.
Indeed, they see it [as] distant,
But We see it [as] near.
On the Day the sky will be like murky oil,
And the mountains will be like wool,
And no friend will ask [anything of] a friend,
They will be shown each other. The criminal will wish that he could be ransomed from the punishment of that Day by his children
And his wife and his brother
And his nearest kindred who shelter him
And whoever is on earth entirely [so] then it could save him.
No! Indeed, it is the Flame [of Hell],
A remover of exteriors.
It invites he who turned his back [on truth] and went away [from obedience]
And collected [wealth] and hoarded.
Indeed, mankind was created anxious:
When evil touches him, impatient,
And when good touches him, withholding [of it],
Except the observers of prayer -
Those who are constant in their prayer
And those within whose wealth is a known right
For the petitioner and the deprived -
And those who believe in the Day of Recompense
And those who are fearful of the punishment of their Lord -
Indeed, the punishment of their Lord is not that from which one is safe -
And those who guard their private parts
Except from their wives or those their right hands possess, for indeed, they are not to be blamed -
But whoever seeks beyond that, then they are the transgressors -
And those who are to their trusts and promises attentive
And those who are in their testimonies upright
And those who [carefully] maintain their prayer:
They will be in gardens, honored.
So what is [the matter] with those who disbelieve, hastening [from] before you, [O Muhammad],
[To sit] on [your] right and [your] left in separate groups?
Does every person among them aspire to enter a garden of pleasure?
No! Indeed, We have created them from that which they know.
So I swear by the Lord of [all] risings and settings that indeed We are able
To replace them with better than them; and We are not to be outdone.
So leave them to converse vainly and amuse themselves until they meet their Day which they are promised -
The Day they will emerge from the graves rapidly as if they were, toward an erected idol, hastening.
Their eyes humbled, humiliation will cover them. That is the Day which they had been promised.
Indeed, We sent Noah to his people, [saying], "Warn your people before there comes to them a painful punishment."
He said, "O my people, indeed I am to you a clear warner,
[Saying], 'Worship Allah, fear Him and obey me.
Allah will forgive you of your sins and delay you for a specified term. Indeed, the time [set by] Allah, when it comes, will not be delayed, if you only knew.’ "
He said, "My Lord, indeed I invited my people [to truth] night and day.
But my invitation increased them not except in flight.
And indeed, every time I invited them that You may forgive them, they put their fingers in their ears, covered themselves with their garments, persisted, and were arrogant with [great] arrogance.
Then I invited them publicly.
Then I announced to them and [also] confided to them secretly
And said, 'Ask forgiveness of your Lord. Indeed, He is ever a Perpetual Forgiver.
He will send [rain from] the sky upon you in [continuing] showers
And give you increase in wealth and children and provide for you gardens and provide for you rivers.
What is [the matter] with you that you do not attribute to Allah [due] grandeur
While He has created you in stages?
Do you not consider how Allah has created seven heavens in layers
And made the moon therein a [reflected] light and made the sun a burning lamp?
And Allah has caused you to grow from the earth a [progressive] growth.
Then He will return you into it and extract you [another] extraction.
And Allah has made for you the earth an expanse
That you may follow therein roads of passage.' "
Noah said, "My Lord, indeed they have disobeyed me and followed him whose wealth and children will not increase him except in loss.
And they conspired an immense conspiracy.
And said, 'Never leave your gods and never leave Wadd or Suwa‘ or Yaghuth and Ya‘uq and Nasr.
And already they have misled many. And, [my Lord], do not increase the wrongdoers except in error."
Because of their sins they were drowned and put into the Fire, and they found not for themselves besides Allah [any] helpers.
And Noah said, "My Lord, do not leave upon the earth from among the disbelievers an inhabitant.
Indeed, if You leave them, they will mislead Your servants and not beget except [every] wicked one and [confirmed] disbeliever.
My Lord, forgive me and my parents and whoever enters my house a believer and the believing men and believing women. And do not increase the wrongdoers except in destruction."
Say, [O Muhammad], "It has been revealed to me that a group of the jinn listened and said, 'Indeed, we have heard an amazing Qur’an.
It guides to the right course, and we have believed in it. And we will never associate with our Lord anyone.
And [it teaches] that exalted is the nobleness of our Lord; He has not taken a wife or a son
And that our foolish one has been saying about Allah an excessive transgression.
And we had thought that mankind and the jinn would never speak about Allah a lie.
And there were men from mankind who sought refuge in men from the jinn, so they [only] increased them in burden.
And they had thought, as you thought, that Allah would never send anyone [as a messenger].
And we have sought [to reach] the heaven but found it filled with powerful guards and burning flames.
And we used to sit therein in positions for hearing, but whoever listens now will find a burning flame lying in wait for him.
And we do not know [therefore] whether evil is intended for those on earth or whether their Lord intends for them a right course.
And among us are the righteous, and among us are [others] not so; we were [of] divided ways.
And we have become certain that we will never cause failure to Allah upon earth, nor can we escape Him by flight.
And when we heard the guidance, we believed in it. And whoever believes in his Lord will not fear deprivation or burden.
And among us are Muslims [in submission to Allah], and among us are the unjust. And whoever has become Muslim - those have sought out the right course.
But as for the unjust, they will be, for Hell, firewood.'
And [Allah revealed] that if they had remained straight on the way, We would have given them abundant provision
So We might test them therein. And whoever turns away from the remembrance of his Lord He will put into arduous punishment.
And [He revealed] that the masjids are for Allah, so do not invoke with Allah anyone.
And that when the Servant of Allah stood up supplicating Him, they almost became about him a compacted mass."
Say, [O Muhammad], "I only invoke my Lord and do not associate with Him anyone."
Say, "Indeed, I do not possess for you [the power of] harm or right direction."
Say, "Indeed, there will never protect me from Allah anyone [if I should disobey], nor will I find in other than Him a refuge.
But [I have for you] only notification from Allah, and His messages." And whoever disobeys Allah and His Messenger - then indeed, for him is the fire of Hell; they will abide therein forever.
[The disbelievers continue] until, when they see that which they are promised, then they will know who is weaker in helpers and less in number.
Say, "I do not know if what you are promised is near or if my Lord will grant for it a [long] period."
[He is] Knower of the unseen, and He does not disclose His [knowledge of the] unseen to anyone
Except whom He has approved of messengers, and indeed, He sends before each messenger and behind him observers
That he may know that they have conveyed the messages of their Lord; and He has encompassed whatever is with them and has enumerated all things in number.
O you who wraps himself [in clothing],
Arise [to pray] the night, except for a little -
Half of it - or subtract from it a little
Or add to it, and recite the Qur’an with measured recitation.
Indeed, We will cast upon you a heavy word.
Indeed, the hours of the night are more effective for concurrence [of heart and tongue] and more suitable for words.
Indeed, for you by day is prolonged occupation.
And remember the name of your Lord and devote yourself to Him with [complete] devotion.
[He is] the Lord of the East and the West; there is no deity except Him, so take Him as Disposer of [your] affairs.
And be patient over what they say and avoid them with gracious avoidance.
And leave Me with [the matter of] the deniers, those of ease [in life], and allow them respite a little.
Indeed, with Us [for them] are shackles and burning fire
And food that chokes and a painful punishment -
On the Day the earth and the mountains will convulse and the mountains will become a heap of sand pouring down.
Indeed, We have sent to you a Messenger as a witness upon you just as We sent to Pharaoh a messenger.
But Pharaoh disobeyed the messenger, so We seized him with a ruinous seizure.
Then how can you fear, if you disbelieve, a Day that will make the children white-haired?
The heaven will break apart therefrom; ever is His promise fulfilled.
Indeed, this is a reminder, so whoever wills may take to his Lord a way.
Indeed, your Lord knows, [O Muhammad], that you stand [in prayer] almost two thirds of the night or half of it or a third of it, and [so do] a group of those with you. And Allah determines [the extent of] the night and the day. He has known that you [Muslims] will not be able to do it and has turned to you in forgiveness, so recite what is easy [for you] of the Qur’an. He has known that there will be among you those who are ill and others traveling throughout the land seeking [something] of the bounty of Allah and others fighting for the cause of Allah. So recite what is easy from it and establish prayer and give zakah and loan Allah a goodly loan. And whatever good you put forward for yourselves - you will find it with Allah. It is better and greater in reward. And seek forgiveness of Allah. Indeed, Allah is Forgiving and Merciful.
O you who covers himself [with a garment],
Arise and warn
And your Lord glorify
And your clothing purify
And uncleanliness avoid
And do not confer favor to acquire more
But for your Lord be patient.
And when the trumpet is blown,
That Day will be a difficult day
For the disbelievers - not easy.
Leave Me with the one I created alone
And to whom I granted extensive wealth
And children present [with him]
And spread [everything] before him, easing [his life].
Then he desires that I should add more.
No! Indeed, he has been toward Our verses obstinate.
I will cover him with arduous torment.
Indeed, he thought and deliberated.
So may he be destroyed [for] how he deliberated.
Then may he be destroyed [for] how he deliberated.
Then he considered [again];
Then he frowned and scowled;
Then he turned back and was arrogant
And said, "This is not but magic imitated [from others].
This is not but the word of a human being."
I will drive him into Saqar.
And what can make you know what is Saqar?
It lets nothing remain and leaves nothing [unburned],
Blackening the skins.
Over it are nineteen [angels].
And We have not made the keepers of the Fire except angels. And We have not made their number except as a trial for those who disbelieve - that those who were given the Scripture will be convinced and those who have believed will increase in faith and those who were given the Scripture and the believers will not doubt and that those in whose hearts is hypocrisy and the disbelievers will say, "What does Allah intend by this as an example?" Thus does Allah leave astray whom He wills and guides whom He wills. And none knows the soldiers of your Lord except Him. And mention of the Fire is not but a reminder to humanity.
No! By the moon
And [by] the night when it departs
And [by] the morning when it brightens,
Indeed, the Fire is of the greatest [afflictions]
As a warning to humanity -
To whoever wills among you to proceed or stay behind.
Every soul, for what it has earned, will be retained
Except the companions of the right,
[Who will be] in gardens, questioning each other
About the criminals,
[And asking them], "What put you into Saqar?"
They will say, "We were not of those who prayed,
Nor did we used to feed the poor.
And we used to enter into vain discourse with those who engaged [in it],
And we used to deny the Day of Recompense
Until there came to us the certainty."
So there will not benefit them the intercession of [any] intercessors.
Then what is [the matter] with them that they are, from the reminder, turning away
As if they were alarmed donkeys
Fleeing from a lion?
Rather, every person among them desires that he would be given scriptures spread about.
No! But they do not fear the Hereafter.
No! Indeed, the Qur’an is a reminder
Then whoever wills will remember it.
And they will not remember except that Allah wills. He is worthy of fear and adequate for [granting] forgiveness.
I swear by the Day of Resurrection
And I swear by the reproaching soul [to the certainty of resurrection].
Does man think that We will not assemble his bones?
Yes. [We are] Able [even] to proportion his fingertips.
But man desires to continue in sin.
He asks, "When is the Day of Resurrection?"
So when vision is dazzled
And the moon darkens
And the sun and the moon are joined,
Man will say on that Day, "Where is the [place of] escape?"
No! There is no refuge.
To your Lord, that Day, is the [place of] permanence.
Man will be informed that Day of what he sent ahead and kept back.
Rather, man, against himself, will be a witness,
Even if he presents his excuses.
Move not your tongue with it, [O Muhammad], to hasten with recitation of the Qur’an.
Indeed, upon Us is its collection [in your heart] and [to make possible] its recitation.
So when We have recited it [through Gabriel], then follow its recitation.
Then upon Us is its clarification [to you].
No! But you love the immediate
And leave the Hereafter.
[Some] faces, that Day, will be radiant,
Looking at their Lord.
And [some] faces, that Day, will be contorted,
Expecting that there will be done to them [something] backbreaking.
No! When the soul has reached the collar bones
And it is said, "Who will cure [him]?"
And the dying one is certain that it is the [time of] separation
And the leg is wound about the leg,
To your Lord, that Day, will be the procession.
And the disbeliever had not believed, nor had he prayed.
But [instead], he denied and turned away.
And then he went to his people, swaggering [in pride].
Woe to you, and woe!
Then woe to you, and woe!
Does man think that he will be left neglected?
Had he not been a sperm from semen emitted?
Then he was a clinging clot, and [Allah] created [his form] and proportioned [him]
And made of him two mates, the male and the female.
Is not that [Creator] Able to give life to the dead?
Has there [not] come upon man a period of time when he was not a thing [even] mentioned?
Indeed, We created man from a sperm-drop mixture that We may try him; and We made him hearing and seeing.
Indeed, We guided him to the way, be he grateful or be he ungrateful.
Indeed, We have prepared for the disbelievers chains and shackles and a blaze.
Indeed, the righteous will drink from a cup [of wine] whose mixture is of Kafur,
A spring of which the [righteous] servants of Allah will drink; they will make it gush forth in force [and abundance].
They [are those who] fulfill [their] vows and fear a Day whose evil will be widespread.
And they give food in spite of love for it to the needy, the orphan, and the captive,
[Saying], "We feed you only for the countenance of Allah. We wish not from you reward or gratitude.
Indeed, We fear from our Lord a Day austere and distressful."
So Allah will protect them from the evil of that Day and give them radiance and happiness
And will reward them for what they patiently endured [with] a garden [in Paradise] and silk [garments].
[They will be] reclining therein on adorned couches. They will not see therein any [burning] sun or [freezing] cold.
And near above them are its shades, and its [fruit] to be picked will be lowered in compliance.
And there will be circulated among them vessels of silver and cups having been [created] clear [as glass],
Clear glasses [made] from silver of which they have determined the measure.
And they will be given to drink a cup [of wine] whose mixture is of ginger
[From] a fountain within Paradise named Salsabeel.
There will circulate among them young boys made eternal. When you see them, you would think them [as beautiful as] scattered pearls.
And when you look there [in Paradise], you will see pleasure and great dominion.
Upon the inhabitants will be green garments of fine silk and brocade. And they will be adorned with bracelets of silver, and their Lord will give them a purifying drink.
[And it will be said], "Indeed, this is for you a reward, and your effort has been appreciated."
Indeed, it is We who have sent down to you, [O Muhammad], the Qur’an progressively.
So be patient for the decision of your Lord and do not obey from among them a sinner or ungrateful [disbeliever].
And mention the name of your Lord [in prayer] morning and evening
And during the night prostrate to Him and exalt Him a long [part of the] night.
Indeed, these [disbelievers] love the immediate and leave behind them a grave Day.
We have created them and strengthened their forms, and when We will, We can change their likenesses with [complete] alteration.
Indeed, this is a reminder, so he who wills may take to his Lord a way.
And you do not will except that Allah wills. Indeed, Allah is ever Knowing and Wise.
He admits whom He wills into His mercy; but the wrongdoers - He has prepared for them a painful punishment.
By those [winds] sent forth in gusts
And the winds that blow violently
And [by] the winds that spread [clouds]
And those [angels] who bring criterion
And those [angels] who deliver a message
As justification or warning,
Indeed, what you are promised is to occur.
So when the stars are obliterated
And when the heaven is opened
And when the mountains are blown away
And when the messengers' time has come...
For what Day was it postponed?
For the Day of Judgement.
And what can make you know what is the Day of Judgement?
Woe, that Day, to the deniers.
Did We not destroy the former peoples?
Then We will follow them with the later ones.
Thus do We deal with the criminals.
Woe, that Day, to the deniers.
Did We not create you from a liquid disdained?
And We placed it in a firm lodging
For a known extent.
And We determined [it], and excellent [are We] to determine.
Woe, that Day, to the deniers.
Have We not made the earth a container
Of the living and the dead?
And We placed therein lofty, firmly set mountains and have given you to drink sweet water.
Woe, that Day, to the deniers.
[They will be told], "Proceed to that which you used to deny.
Proceed to a shadow [of smoke] having three columns
[But having] no cool shade and availing not against the flame."
Indeed, it throws sparks [as huge] as a fortress,
As if they were yellowish [black] camels.
Woe, that Day, to the deniers.
This is a Day they will not speak,
Nor will it be permitted for them to make an excuse.
Woe, that Day, to the deniers.
This is the Day of Judgement; We will have assembled you and the former peoples.
So if you have a plan, then plan against Me.
Woe, that Day, to the deniers.
Indeed, the righteous will be among shades and springs
And fruits from whatever they desire,
[Being told], "Eat and drink in satisfaction for what you used to do."
Indeed, We thus reward the doers of good.
Woe, that Day, to the deniers.
[O disbelievers], eat and enjoy yourselves a little; indeed, you are criminals.
Woe, that Day, to the deniers.
And when it is said to them, "Bow [in prayer]," they do not bow.
Woe, that Day, to the deniers.
Then in what statement after the Qur’an will they believe?
About what are they asking one another?
About the great news -
That over which they are in disagreement.
No! They are going to know.
Then, no! They are going to know.
Have We not made the earth a resting place?
And the mountains as stakes?
And We created you in pairs
And made your sleep [a means for] rest
And made the night as clothing
And made the day for livelihood
And constructed above you seven strong [heavens]
And made [therein] a burning lamp
And sent down, from the rain clouds, pouring water
That We may bring forth thereby grain and vegetation
And gardens of entwined growth.
Indeed, the Day of Judgement is an appointed time -
The Day the Horn is blown and you will come forth in multitudes
And the heaven is opened and will become gateways
And the mountains are removed and will be [but] a mirage.
Indeed, Hell has been lying in wait
For the transgressors, a place of return,
In which they will remain for ages [unending].
They will not taste therein [any] coolness or drink
Except scalding water and [foul] purulence -
An appropriate recompense.
Indeed, they were not expecting an account
And denied Our verses with [emphatic] denial.
But all things We have enumerated in writing.
"So taste [the penalty], and never will We increase you except in torment."
Indeed, for the righteous is attainment -
Gardens and grapevines
And full-breasted [companions] of equal age
And a full cup.
No ill speech will they hear therein or any falsehood -
[As] reward from your Lord, [a generous] gift [made due by] account,
[From] the Lord of the heavens and the earth and whatever is between them, the Most Merciful. They possess not from Him [authority for] speech.
The Day that the Spirit and the angels will stand in rows, they will not speak except for one whom the Most Merciful permits, and he will say what is correct.
That is the True Day; so he who wills may take to his Lord a [way of] return.
Indeed, We have warned you of a near punishment on the Day when a man will observe what his hands have put forth and the disbeliever will say, "Oh, I wish that I were dust!"
By those [angels] who extract with violence
And [by] those who remove with ease
And [by] those who glide [as if] swimming
And those who race each other in a race
And those who arrange [each] matter,
On the Day the blast [of the Horn] will convulse [creation],
There will follow it the subsequent [one].
Hearts, that Day, will tremble,
Their eyes humbled.
They are [presently] saying, "Will we indeed be returned to [our] former state [of life]?
Even if we should be decayed bones?
They say, "That, then, would be a losing return."
Indeed, it will be but one shout,
And suddenly they will be [alert] upon the earth's surface.
Has there reached you the story of Moses? -
When his Lord called to him in the sacred valley of Tuwa,
"Go to Pharaoh. Indeed, he has transgressed.
And say to him, 'Would you [be willing to] purify yourself
And let me guide you to your Lord so you would fear [Him]?'"
And he showed him the greatest sign,
But Pharaoh denied and disobeyed.
Then he turned his back, striving.
And he gathered [his people] and called out
And said, "I am your most exalted lord."
So Allah seized him in exemplary punishment for the last and the first [transgression].
Indeed in that is a warning for whoever would fear [Allah].
Are you a more difficult creation or is the heaven? Allah constructed it.
He raised its ceiling and proportioned it.
And He darkened its night and extracted its brightness.
And after that He spread the earth.
He extracted from it its water and its pasture,
And the mountains He set firmly
As provision for you and your grazing livestock.
But when there comes the greatest Overwhelming Calamity -
The Day when man will remember that for which he strove,
And Hellfire will be exposed for [all] those who see -
So as for he who transgressed
And preferred the life of the world,
Then indeed, Hellfire will be [his] refuge.
But as for he who feared the position of his Lord and prevented the soul from [unlawful] inclination,
Then indeed, Paradise will be [his] refuge.
They ask you, [O Muhammad], about the Hour: when is its arrival?
In what [position] are you that you should mention it?
To your Lord is its finality.
You are only a warner for those who fear it.
It will be, on the Day they see it, as though they had not remained [in the world] except for an afternoon or a morning thereof.
The Prophet frowned and turned away
Because there came to him the blind man, [interrupting].
But what would make you perceive, [O Muhammad], that perhaps he might be purified
Or be reminded and the remembrance would benefit him?
As for he who thinks himself without need,
To him you give attention.
And not upon you [is any blame] if he will not be purified.
But as for he who came to you striving [for knowledge]
While he fears [Allah],
From him you are distracted.
No! Indeed, these verses are a reminder;
So whoever wills may remember it.
[It is recorded] in honored sheets,
Exalted and purified,
[Carried] by the hands of messenger-angels,
Noble and dutiful.
Cursed is man; how disbelieving is he.
From what substance did He create him?
From a sperm-drop He created him and destined for him;
Then He eased the way for him;
Then He causes his death and provides a grave for him.
Then when He wills, He will resurrect him.
No! Man has not yet accomplished what He commanded him.
Then let mankind look at his food -
How We poured down water in torrents,
Then We broke open the earth, splitting [it with sprouts],
And caused to grow within it grain
And grapes and herbage
And olive and palm trees
And gardens of dense shrubbery
And fruit and grass -
[As] enjoyment for you and your grazing livestock.
But when there comes the Deafening Blast
On the Day a man will flee from his brother
And his mother and his father
And his wife and his children,
For every man, that Day, will be a matter adequate for him.
[Some] faces, that Day, will be bright -
Laughing, rejoicing at good news.
And [other] faces, that Day, will have upon them dust.
Blackness will cover them.
Those are the disbelievers, the wicked ones.
When the sun is wrapped up [in darkness]
And when the stars fall, dispersing,
And when the mountains are removed
And when full-term she-camels are neglected
And when the wild beasts are gathered
And when the seas are filled with flame
And when the souls are paired
And when the girl [who was] buried alive is asked
For what sin she was killed
And when the pages are made public
And when the sky is stripped away
And when Hellfire is set ablaze
And when Paradise is brought near,
A soul will [then] know what it has brought [with it].
So I swear by the retreating stars -
Those that run [their courses] and disappear -
And by the night as it closes in
And by the dawn when it breathes
[That] indeed, the Qur’an is a word [conveyed by] a noble messenger
[Who is] possessed of power and with the Owner of the Throne, secure [in position],
Obeyed there [in the heavens] and trustworthy.
And your companion is not [at all] mad.
And he has already seen Gabriel in the clear horizon.
And Muhammad is not a withholder of [knowledge of] the unseen.
And the Qur’an is not the word of a devil, expelled [from the heavens].
So where are you going?
It is not except a reminder to the worlds
For whoever wills among you to take a right course.
And you do not will except that Allah wills - Lord of the worlds.
When the sky breaks apart
And when the stars fall, scattering,
And when the seas are erupted
And when the [contents of] graves are scattered,
A soul will [then] know what it has put forth and kept back.
O mankind, what has deceived you concerning your Lord, the Generous,
Who created you, proportioned you, and balanced you?
In whatever form He willed has He assembled you.
No! But you deny the Recompense.
And indeed, [appointed] over you are keepers,
Noble and recording;
They know whatever you do.
Indeed, the righteous will be in pleasure,
And indeed, the wicked will be in Hellfire.
They will [enter to] burn therein on the Day of Recompense,
And never therefrom will they be absent.
And what can make you know what is the Day of Recompense?
Then, what can make you know what is the Day of Recompense?
It is the Day when a soul will not possess for another soul [power to do] a thing; and the command, that Day, is [entirely] with Allah.
Woe to those who give less [than due],
Who, when they take a measure from people, take in full.
But if they give by measure or by weight to them, they cause loss.
Do they not think that they will be resurrected
For a tremendous Day -
The Day when mankind will stand before the Lord of the worlds?
No! Indeed, the record of the wicked is in sijjeen.
And what can make you know what is sijjeen?
It is [their destination recorded in] a register inscribed.
Woe, that Day, to the deniers,
Who deny the Day of Recompense.
And none deny it except every sinful transgressor.
When Our verses are recited to him, he says, "Legends of the former peoples."
No! Rather, the stain has covered their hearts of that which they were earning.
No! Indeed, from their Lord, that Day, they will be partitioned.
Then indeed, they will [enter and] burn in Hellfire.
Then it will be said [to them], "This is what you used to deny."
No! Indeed, the record of the righteous is in ‘illiyyun.
And what can make you know what is ‘illiyyun?
It is [their destination recorded in] a register inscribed
Which is witnessed by those brought near [to Allah].
Indeed, the righteous will be in pleasure
On adorned couches, observing.
You will recognize in their faces the radiance of pleasure.
They will be given to drink [pure] wine [which was] sealed.
The last of it is musk. So for this let the competitors compete.
And its mixture is of Tasneem,
A spring from which those near [to Allah] drink.
Indeed, those who committed crimes used to laugh at those who believed.
And when they passed by them, they would exchange derisive glances.
And when they returned to their people, they would return jesting.
And when they saw them, they would say, "Indeed, those are truly lost."
But they had not been sent as guardians over them.
So Today those who believed are laughing at the disbelievers,
On adorned couches, observing.
Have the disbelievers [not] been rewarded [this Day] for what they used to do?
When the sky has split [open]
And has responded to its Lord and was obligated [to do so]
And when the earth has been extended
And has cast out that within it and relinquished [it]
And has responded to its Lord and was obligated [to do so] -
O mankind, indeed you are laboring toward your Lord with [great] exertion and will meet it.
Then as for he who is given his record in his right hand,
He will be judged with an easy account
And return to his people in happiness.
But as for he who is given his record behind his back,
He will cry out for destruction
And [enter to] burn in a Blaze.
Indeed, he had [once] been among his people in happiness;
Indeed, he had thought he would never return [to Allah].
But yes! Indeed, his Lord was ever of him, Seeing.
So I swear by the twilight glow
And [by] the night and what it envelops
And [by] the moon when it becomes full
[That] you will surely experience state after state.
So what is [the matter] with them [that] they do not believe,
And when the Qur’an is recited to them, they do not prostrate [to Allah]?
But those who have disbelieved deny,
And Allah is most knowing of what they keep within themselves.
So give them tidings of a painful punishment,
Except for those who believe and do righteous deeds. For them is a reward uninterrupted.
By the sky containing great stars
And [by] the promised Day
And [by] the witness and what is witnessed,
Cursed were the companions of the trench
[Containing] the fire full of fuel,
When they were sitting near it
And they, to what they were doing against the believers, were witnesses.
And they resented them not except because they believed in Allah, the Exalted in Might, the Praiseworthy,
To whom belongs the dominion of the heavens and the earth. And Allah, over all things, is Witness.
Indeed, those who have tortured the believing men and believing women and then have not repented will have the punishment of Hell, and they will have the punishment of the Burning Fire.
Indeed, those who have believed and done righteous deeds will have gardens beneath which rivers flow. That is the great attainment.
Indeed, the vengeance of your Lord is severe.
Indeed, it is He who originates [creation] and repeats.
And He is the Forgiving, the Affectionate,
Honorable Owner of the Throne,
Effecter of what He intends.
Has there reached you the story of the soldiers -
[Those of] Pharaoh and Thamud?
But they who disbelieve are in [persistent] denial,
While Allah encompasses them from behind.
But this is an honored Qur’an
[Inscribed] in a Preserved Slate.
By the sky and the night comer -
And what can make you know what is the night comer?
It is the piercing star -
There is no soul but that it has over it a protector.
So let man observe from what he was created.
He was created from a fluid, ejected,
Emerging from between the backbone and the ribs.
Indeed, Allah, to return him [to life], is Able.
The Day when secrets will be put on trial,
Then man will have no power or any helper.
By the sky which returns [rain]
And [by] the earth which cracks open,
Indeed, the Qur’an is a decisive statement,
And it is not amusement.
Indeed, they are planning a plan,
But I am planning a plan.
So allow time for the disbelievers. Leave them awhile.
Exalt the name of your Lord, the Most High,
Who created and proportioned
And who destined and [then] guided
And who brings out the pasture
And [then] makes it black stubble.
We will make you recite, [O Muhammad], and you will not forget,
Except what Allah should will. Indeed, He knows what is declared and what is hidden.
And We will ease you toward ease.
So remind, if the reminder should benefit;
He who fears [Allah] will be reminded.
But the wretched one will avoid it -
[He] who will [enter and] burn in the greatest Fire,
Neither dying therein nor living.
He has certainly succeeded who purifies himself
And mentions the name of his Lord and prays.
But you prefer the worldly life,
While the Hereafter is better and more enduring.
Indeed, this is in the former scriptures,
The scriptures of Abraham and Moses.
Has there reached you the report of the Overwhelming [event]?
[Some] faces, that Day, will be humbled,
Working [hard] and exhausted.
They will [enter to] burn in an intensely hot Fire.
They will be given drink from a boiling spring.
For them there will be no food except from a poisonous, thorny plant
Which neither nourishes nor avails against hunger.
[Other] faces, that Day, will show pleasure.
With their effort [they are] satisfied
In an elevated garden,
Wherein they will hear no unsuitable speech.
Within it is a flowing spring.
Within it are couches raised high
And cups put in place
And cushions lined up
And carpets spread around.
Then do they not look at the camels - how they are created?
And at the sky - how it is raised?
And at the mountains - how they are erected?
And at the earth - how it is spread out?
So remind, [O Muhammad]; you are only a reminder.
You are not over them a controller.
However, he who turns away and disbelieves -
Then Allah will punish him with the greatest punishment.
Indeed, to Us is their return.
Then indeed, upon Us is their account.
By the dawn
And [by] ten nights
And [by] the even [number] and the odd
And [by] the night when it passes,
Is there [not] in [all] that an oath [sufficient] for one of perception?
Have you not considered how your Lord dealt with ‘Aad -
[With] Iram - who had lofty pillars,
The likes of whom had never been created in the land?
And [with] Thamud, who carved out the rocks in the valley?
And [with] Pharaoh, owner of the stakes? -
[All of] whom oppressed within the lands
And increased therein the corruption.
So your Lord poured upon them a scourge of punishment.
Indeed, your Lord is in observation.
And as for man, when his Lord tries him and [thus] is generous to him and favors him, he says, "My Lord has honored me."
But when He tries him and restricts his provision, he says, "My Lord has humiliated me."
No! But you do not honor the orphan
And you do not encourage one another to feed the poor.
And you consume inheritance, devouring [it] altogether,
And you love wealth with immense love.
No! When the earth has been leveled - pounded and crushed -
And your Lord has come and the angels, rank upon rank,
And brought [within view], that Day, is Hell - that Day, man will remember, but what good to him will be the remembrance?
He will say, "Oh, I wish I had sent ahead [some good] for my life."
So on that Day, none will punish [as severely] as His punishment,
And none will bind [as severely] as His binding [of the evildoers].
[To the righteous it will be said], "O reassured soul,
Return to your Lord, well-pleased and pleasing [to Him],
And enter among My [righteous] servants
And enter My Paradise."
I swear by this city, Makkah -
And you, [O Muhammad], are free of restriction in this city -
And [by] the father and that which was born [of him],
We have certainly created man into hardship.
Does he think that never will anyone overcome him?
He says, "I have spent wealth in abundance."
Does he think that no one has seen him?
Have We not made for him two eyes?
And a tongue and two lips?
And have shown him the two ways?
But he has not broken through the difficult pass.
And what can make you know what is [breaking through] the difficult pass?
It is the freeing of a slave
Or feeding on a day of severe hunger
An orphan of near relationship
Or a needy person in misery
And then being among those who believed and advised one another to patience and advised one another to compassion.
Those are the companions of the right.
But they who disbelieved in Our signs - those are the companions of the left.
Over them will be fire closed in.
By the sun and its brightness
And [by] the moon when it follows it
And [by] the day when it displays it
And [by] the night when it covers it
And [by] the sky and He who constructed it
And [by] the earth and He who spread it
And [by] the soul and He who proportioned it
And inspired it [with discernment of] its wickedness and its righteousness,
He has succeeded who purifies it,
And he has failed who instills it [with corruption].
Thamud denied [their prophet] by reason of their transgression,
When the most wretched of them was sent forth.
And the messenger of Allah [Salih] said to them, "[Do not harm] the she-camel of Allah or [prevent her from] her drink."
But they denied him and hamstrung her. So their Lord brought down upon them destruction for their sin and made it equal [upon all of them].
And He does not fear the consequence thereof.
By the night when it covers
And [by] the day when it appears
And [by] He who created the male and female,
Indeed, your efforts are diverse.
As for he who gives and fears Allah
And believes in the best [reward],
We will ease him toward ease.
But as for he who withholds and considers himself free of need
And denies the best [reward],
We will ease him toward difficulty.
And what will his wealth avail him when he falls?
Indeed, [incumbent] upon Us is guidance.
And indeed, to Us belongs the Hereafter and the first [life].
So I have warned you of a Fire which is blazing.
None will [enter to] burn therein except the most wretched one.
Who had denied and turned away.
But the righteous one will avoid it -
[He] who gives [from] his wealth to purify himself
And not [giving] for anyone who has [done him] a favor to be rewarded
But only seeking the countenance of his Lord, Most High.
And he is going to be satisfied.
By the morning brightness
And [by] the night when it covers with darkness,
Your Lord has not taken leave of you, [O Muhammad], nor has He detested [you].
And the Hereafter is better for you than the first [life].
And your Lord is going to give you, and you will be satisfied.
Did He not find you an orphan and give [you] refuge?
And He found you lost and guided [you],
And He found you poor and made [you] self-sufficient.
So as for the orphan, do not oppress [him].
And as for the petitioner, do not repel [him].
But as for the favor of your Lord, report [it].
Did We not expand for you, [O Muhammad], your breast?
And We removed from you your burden
Which had weighed upon your back
And raised high for you your repute.
For indeed, with hardship [will be] ease.
Indeed, with hardship [will be] ease.
So when you have finished [your duties], then stand up [for worship].
And to your Lord direct [your] longing.
By the fig and the olive
And [by] Mount Sinai
And [by] this secure city [Makkah],
We have certainly created man in the best of stature;
Then We return him to the lowest of the low,
Except for those who believe and do righteous deeds, for they will have a reward uninterrupted.
So what yet causes you to deny the Recompense?
Is not Allah the most just of judges?
Recite in the name of your Lord who created -
Created man from a clinging substance.
Recite, and your Lord is the most Generous -
Who taught by the pen -
Taught man that which he knew not.
No! [But] indeed, man transgresses
Because he sees himself self-sufficient.
Indeed, to your Lord is the return.
Have you seen the one who forbids
A servant when he prays?
Have you seen if he is upon guidance
Or enjoins righteousness?
Have you seen if he denies and turns away -
Does he not know that Allah sees?
No! If he does not desist, We will surely drag him by the forelock -
A lying, sinning forelock.
Then let him call his associates;
We will call the angels of Hell.
No! Do not obey him. But prostrate and draw near [to Allah].
Indeed, We sent the Qur’an down during the Night of Decree.
And what can make you know what is the Night of Decree?
The Night of Decree is better than a thousand months.
The angels and the Spirit descend therein by permission of their Lord for every matter.
Peace it is until the emergence of dawn.
Those who disbelieved among the People of the Scripture and the polytheists were not to be parted [from misbelief] until there came to them clear evidence -
A Messenger from Allah, reciting purified scriptures
Within which are correct writings.
Nor did those who were given the Scripture become divided until after there had come to them clear evidence.
And they were not commanded except to worship Allah, [being] sincere to Him in religion, inclining to truth, and to establish prayer and to give zakah. And that is the correct religion.
Indeed, they who disbelieved among the People of the Scripture and the polytheists will be in the fire of Hell, abiding eternally therein. Those are the worst of creatures.
Indeed, they who have believed and done righteous deeds - those are the best of creatures.
Their reward with Allah will be gardens of perpetual residence beneath which rivers flow, wherein they will abide forever, Allah being pleased with them and they with Him. That is for whoever has feared his Lord.
When the earth is shaken with its [final] earthquake
And the earth discharges its burdens
And man says, "What is [wrong] with it?" -
That Day, it will report its news
Because your Lord has commanded it.
That Day, the people will depart separated [into categories] to be shown [the result of] their deeds.
So whoever does an atom’s weight of good will see it,
And whoever does an atom’s weight of evil will see it.
By the racers, panting,
And the producers of sparks [when] striking
And the chargers at dawn,
Stirring up thereby [clouds of] dust,
Arriving thereby in the center collectively,
Indeed mankind, to his Lord, is ungrateful.
And indeed, he is to that a witness.
And indeed he is, in love of wealth, intense.
But does he not know that when the contents of the graves are scattered
And that within the breasts is obtained,
Indeed, their Lord with them, that Day, is [fully] Acquainted.
The Striking Calamity -
What is the Striking Calamity?
And what can make you know what is the Striking Calamity?
It is the Day when people will be like moths, dispersed,
And the mountains will be like wool, fluffed up.
Then as for one whose scales are heavy [with good deeds],
He will be in a pleasant life.
But as for one whose scales are light,
His refuge will be an abyss.
And what can make you know what that is?
It is a Fire, intensely hot.
Competition in [worldly] increase diverts you
Until you visit the graveyards.
No! You are going to know.
Then no! You are going to know.
No! If you only knew with knowledge of certainty...
You will surely see the Hellfire.
Then you will surely see it with the eye of certainty.
Then you will surely be asked that Day about pleasure.
By time,
Indeed, mankind is in loss,
Except for those who have believed and done righteous deeds and advised each other to truth and advised each other to patience.
Woe to every scorner and mocker
Who collects wealth and [continuously] counts it.
He thinks that his wealth will make him immortal.
No! He will surely be thrown into the Crusher.
And what can make you know what is the Crusher?
It is the fire of Allah, [eternally] fueled,
Which mounts directed at the hearts.
Indeed, Hellfire will be closed down upon them
In extended columns.
Have you not considered, [O Muhammad], how your Lord dealt with the companions of the elephant?
Did He not make their plan into misguidance?
And He sent against them birds in flocks,
Striking them with stones of hard clay,
And He made them like eaten straw.
For the accustomed security of the Quraysh -
Their accustomed security [in] the caravan of winter and summer -
Let them worship the Lord of this House,
Who has fed them, [saving them] from hunger and made them safe, [saving them] from fear.
Have you seen the one who denies the Recompense?
For that is the one who drives away the orphan
And does not encourage the feeding of the poor.
So woe to those who pray
[But] who are heedless of their prayer -
Those who make show [of their deeds]
And withhold [simple] assistance.
Indeed, We have granted you, [O Muhammad], al-Kawthar.
So pray to your Lord and sacrifice [to Him alone].
Indeed, your enemy is the one cut off.
Say, "O disbelievers,
I do not worship what you worship.
Nor are you worshippers of what I worship.
Nor will I be a worshipper of what you worship.
Nor will you be worshippers of what I worship.
For you is your religion, and for me is my religion."
When the victory of Allah has come and the conquest,
And you see the people entering into the religion of Allah in multitudes,
Then exalt [Him] with praise of your Lord and ask forgiveness of Him. Indeed, He is ever Accepting of repentance.
May the hands of Abu Lahab be ruined, and ruined is he.
His wealth will not avail him or that which he gained.
He will [enter to] burn in a Fire of [blazing] flame
And his wife [as well] - the carrier of firewood.
Around her neck is a rope of [twisted] fiber.
Say, "He is Allah, [who is] One,
Allah, the Eternal Refuge.
He neither begets nor is born,
Nor is there to Him any equivalent."
Say, "I seek refuge in the Lord of daybreak
From the evil of that which He created
And from the evil of darkness when it settles
And from the evil of the blowers in knots
And from the evil of an envier when he envies."
Say, "I seek refuge in the Lord of mankind,
The Sovereign of mankind.
The God of mankind,
From the evil of the retreating whisperer -
Who whispers [evil] into the breasts of mankind -
From among the jinn and mankind."
